Oklahoma, session 2025, SB767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1000 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as “Fair Chance Hiring


Practices by Public Employers Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1000.1 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 58 Page 1


As used in this act:


1. “Public employer” means the State of Oklahoma or any


political subdivision thereof, including any department, agency,


board, commission, institution, authority, public trust,


municipality, county, district, or instrumentality thereof;


2. “Criminal record history information” means records related


to a past criminal conviction, arrest, deferred adjudication, or


juvenile adjudication; and


3. “Sensitive positions” means any position:


a. at a school district as defined in Section 1-108 of


Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. at a state educational institution as defined in


Section 3102 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


c. with a law enforcement agency requiring Council on Law


Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET)


certification,


d. as a jailer or correctional officer,


e that works with or includes access to children or


vulnerable adults, and


f. with a public employer whose primary purpose is to


perform financial or fiduciary functions.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1000.2 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 58 Page 2


This act shall not apply to:


1. Sensitive positions as defined in Section 2 of this act;


2. Private contractors or vendors conducting business with a


public employer; or


3. Positions under which federal, state, or local law requires


the consideration of an applicant’s criminal record history


information.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1000.3 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, before


making a conditional offer of employment to an applicant, a public


employer may not:


1. Obtain criminal history record information relating to the


applicant; or


2. Ask an applicant for employment to disclose, orally or in


writing, information concerning the applicant’s criminal history.


B. However, before making a conditional offer of employment to


an applicant, a public employer may:


1. Notify an applicant that under federal, state, or local law,


certain criminal convictions disqualify the applicant from


consideration for the position; and


2. Include a question in an initial employment application form


regarding whether the applicant has a prior criminal conviction that

Req. No. 58 Page 3


would disqualify the applicant from employment under federal, state,


or local law. Such questions shall be limited to offenses that


result in disqualification under federal, state, or local law.


C. This section does not prohibit a public employer from:


1. Asking an applicant for information about an applicant’s


criminal record history information after the public employer has


made a conditional offer of employment;


2. Obtaining criminal record history information after a


conditional offer of employment; or


3. Considering the criminal record history information when


making final hiring decisions.


D. The provisions of this act shall only apply to employment


applications submitted on or after the effective date of this act.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-58 MR 1/19/2025 5:42:56 AM

















Req. No. 58 Page 4